Hawaii statutes.
[§607-2.5] Exemption of costs and fees.
Persons subject to domestic abuse, abuse of family or household members,
stalking, or sexual assault shall be exempt from paying the costs and fees
prescribed in this chapter in connection with filing, issuance, registration,
or service of a protection order, or a petition for a protection order,
warrant, or witness subpoena issued for the purpose of preventing violent or
threatening acts or harassment against, or contact or communication with or
physical proximity to, another person. For purposes of this section, the term
"protection order" means any temporary or final order of protection,
a restraining order, or an injunction involving domestic abuse, abuse of family
or household members, stalking, or sexual assault issued by a civil or criminal
court, other than a support or custody order. [L 2003, c 65, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next